Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-2326.02
Clerk of the district court; deposit of funds.

All public funds paid to or coming into the hands of any clerk of the district court shall be deposited in such bank, capital stock financial institution, or qualifying mutual financial institution as shall have been designated as official depositories for such funds. Such deposits shall be subject to the provisions and conditions provided in sections 77-2326.03 to 77-2326.09. Section 77-2366 shall apply to deposits in capital stock financial institutions. Section 77-2365.01 shall apply to deposits in qualifying mutual financial institutions.

Laws 1947, c. 269, § 2, p. 869;

Laws 1988, LB 370, § 13;

Laws 1989, LB 33, § 44;

Laws 2001, LB 362, § 44.